Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 3 Practice of Pharmacy

Administrative rules and regulations.

Pharmacy Technicians and Other Pharmacy Personnel, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia State of Pharmacy, Chapter 480-15.

26-4-40.
Unlawful to practice pharmacy without license; exception; fine.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, it shall be unlawful for any individual to engage in the practice of pharmacy unless currently licensed to practice under the provisions of this chapter.

Practitioners authorized under the laws of this state to compound drugs and to dispense drugs to their patients in the practice of their respective professions shall not be required to be licensed under the provisions of this chapter; however, practitioners shall meet the same standards, record-keeping requirements, and all other requirements for the dispensing of drugs applicable to pharmacists.

Any individual who, after hearing, shall be found by the board to have unlawfully engaged in the practice of pharmacy shall be subject to a fine to be imposed by the board for each offense. Each violation of this chapter pertaining to unlawfully engaging in the practice of pharmacy shall also constitute a felony punishable upon conviction thereof by a fine of not less than $500.00 nor more than $1,000.00 or by imprisonment for not less than two nor more than five years, or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, a period was substituted for a semicolon at the end of subsection (a).

26-4-41.
Qualifications for license; examination; internship and other training programs.

Qualifications. To obtain a license to engage in the practice of pharmacy, an applicant for licensure by examination shall:

Have submitted an application in the form prescribed by the board;

Have attained the age of majority;

Be of good moral character;

Have graduated and received a professional undergraduate degree from a college or school of pharmacy as the same may be approved by the board; provided, however, that, since it would be impractical for the board to evaluate a school or college of pharmacy located in another country, the board may accept a graduate from such a school or college so long as the graduate has completed all requirements of the Foreign Pharmacy Equivalency Certification Program administered by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy. This shall include successful completion of all required examinations and the issuance of the equivalency certificate and be based upon an individual evaluation by the board of the applicant’s educational experience, professional background, and proficiency in the English language;

Have completed an internship or other program that has been approved by the board or demonstrated to the board’s satisfaction that experience in the practice of pharmacy which meets or exceeds the minimum internship requirements of the board;

Have successfully passed an examination or examinations approved by the board; and

Have paid the fees specified by the board for the examination and any related materials and have paid for the issuance of the license.

Examinations.

The examination for licensure required under paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be made available at least two times during each year. The board shall determine the content and subject matter of each examination, and the place, time, and date of administration of the examination.

The examination shall be prepared to measure the competence of the applicant to engage in the practice of pharmacy. The board may employ, cooperate, and contract with any organization or consultant in the preparation and grading of an examination, but shall retain the sole discretion and responsibility for determining which applicants have successfully passed such an examination.

Any person who takes the board approved examination and fails the examination may repeat the examination at regular intervals of administration; however, a person shall not take the examination more than three times without permission from the board. A person who has taken the board approved examination and failed the examination for the third time shall not practice as a pharmacy intern. A person who takes the board approved examination and successfully completes the examination must become licensed within two years of the examination date or the results of the examination shall become invalid.

Internship and other training programs.

All applicants for licensure by examination shall obtain practical experience in the practice of pharmacy concurrent with or after college attendance or both under such terms and conditions as the board shall determine.

The board shall establish such licensure requirements for interns and standards for internship or any other experiential program necessary to qualify an applicant for the licensure examination and shall also determine the qualifications of preceptors used in practical experience programs.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 26; Ga. L. 2010, p. 266, § 2/SB 195; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 26/HB 142.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, “Internship and other training programs” was substituted for “Internship and Other Training Programs” in subsection (c).

26-4-42.
License transfers for pharmacists licensed in another jurisdiction.

In order for a pharmacist currently licensed in another jurisdiction to obtain a license as a pharmacist by license transfer in this state, an applicant shall:

Complete and file a form applying for licensure with the board, which form shall include the applicant’s name, address, and other such information as prescribed by the board, and, after an investigation by agents acting on behalf of the board, if so requested by the board, produce evidence satisfactory to the board which shows the applicant has the age, moral character, background, education, and experience demanded of applicants for registration by examination under this chapter and by the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter;

Have attained the age of majority;

Be of good moral character;

Have possessed at the time of initial licensure as a pharmacist all qualifications necessary to have been eligible for licensure at that time in this state;

Have presented to the board proof of initial licensure by examination and proof that such license is in good standing;

Have presented to the board proof that any other license granted to the applicant by any other state has not been suspended, revoked, or otherwise restricted for any reason except nonrenewal or for the failure to obtain the required continuing education credits in any state where the applicant is currently licensed but not engaged in the practice of pharmacy;

Have successfully passed examinations as determined by the board, one of which shall include an examination on Georgia pharmacy law and board regulations; and

Have paid the fees specified by the board.

No applicant shall be eligible for license transfer unless the state in which the applicant was licensed as a pharmacist also grants licensure transfer to pharmacists duly licensed by examination in this state under like circumstances and conditions.

To obtain a license to engage in the practice of pharmacy in this state, a pharmacist who is a graduate of a pharmacy school or college located in another country must complete all requirements of the Foreign Pharmacy Equivalency Certification Program administered by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy. This shall include without being limited to successful completion of all required examinations, the issuance of the equivalency certificate, and an individual evaluation by the board of the applicant’s proficiency in the English language. Additionally, a foreign pharmacy graduate applicant shall:

Have submitted an application in the form prescribed by the board;

Have attained the age of majority;

Be of good moral character;

Have possessed at the time of initial licensure as a pharmacist all qualifications necessary to have been eligible for licensure at that time in this state;

Have graduated and been granted a pharmacy degree from a college or school of pharmacy recognized by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee;

Have successfully passed an examination approved by the board; and

Have paid the fees specified by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 5; Ga. L. 2010, p. 266, § 3/SB 195; Ga. L. 2013, p. 127, § 2/HB 209.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in paragraph (a)(7), substituted “examinations as determined” for “an examination”, and inserted “, one of which shall include an examination”.

26-4-43.
Temporary licenses.

A temporary license may be issued by the executive director upon the approval of the president of the board if an applicant produces satisfactory evidence of fulfilling the requirements for licensure under this article, except the examination requirement, and evidence of an emergency situation justifying such temporary license. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, temporary licenses shall expire at the end of the month following the third board meeting conducted after the issuance of such license and may not be reissued or renewed.

A temporary license may be issued to a service member, as defined in Code Section 26-4-44.2, for a period of six months. The board shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate this subsection.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, applicants who have been accepted for a pharmacy resident position in this state may be issued a temporary license if they meet the examination requirement for licensure as specified by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1706, § 19; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-12/HB 132; Ga. L. 2016, p. 855, § 3/HB 926.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “executive director” for “division director” near the beginning of this Code section.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, designated the previously existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a), and, in subsection (a), in the second sentence, substituted “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section,” for “All” and substituted “month following the third board meeting conducted after” for “month during which the first board meeting is conducted following”; and added subsections (b) and (c).

26-4-44.
Renewal of licenses.

Each pharmacist shall apply for renewal of his or her license biennially pursuant to the rules and regulations promulgated by the board. A pharmacist who desires to continue in the practice of pharmacy in this state shall file with the board an application in such form and containing such data as the board may require for renewal of the license. Notice of any change of employment or change of business address shall be filed with the executive director within ten days after such change. If the board finds that the applicant has been licensed and that such license has not been revoked or placed under suspension and that the applicant has paid the renewal fee, has continued his or her pharmacy education in accordance with Code Section 26-4-45 and the rules and regulations of the board, and is entitled to continue in the practice of pharmacy, then the board shall issue a license to the applicant.

If a pharmacist fails to make application to the board for renewal of his or her license as set forth in and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the pharmacist must apply for reinstatement pursuant to the rules of the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1706, § 19; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-13/HB 132.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “executive director” for “division director” in the third sentence of subsection (a).

26-4-44.1.
Inactive license status.

The board shall provide by rule for an inactive pharmacist license status for those individuals who elect to apply for such status. Persons who are granted inactive status shall be exempt from the requirements of continuing pharmaceuticals education.

The board shall provide by rule for reactivation of a pharmacist license for those persons who wish to have an active license. Such individuals must first file a reactivation application with the board and comply with the requirements for reactivation as set forth by board rule.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-44.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 6.

26-4-44.2.
Exceptions for active duty service members.

As used in this Code section, the term “service member” means an active duty member of the regular or reserve component of the United States Armed forces, the United States Coast Guard, the Georgia National Guard, or the Georgia Air National Guard who was on ordered federal duty for a period of 90 days or longer.

Any service member whose license issued pursuant to this article expired while such service member was serving on active duty outside the state shall be permitted to practice pharmacy in accordance with such expired license and shall not be charged with a violation of this chapter related to practicing pharmacy with an expired license for a period of six months from the date of his or her discharge from active duty or reassignment to a location within the state. Any such service member shall be entitled to renew such expired license without penalty within six months after the date of his or her discharge from active duty or reassignment to a location within the state. The service member must present to the board either a copy of the official military orders or a written verification signed by the service member’s commanding officer to waive any charges.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-44.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 213, § 2/SB 258.

26-4-45.
Continuing professional pharmaceutical education requirements.

The board shall establish a program of continuing professional pharmaceutical education for the renewal of pharmacist licenses. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no pharmacist license shall be renewed by the board or the executive director until the pharmacist submits to the board satisfactory proof of his or her participation, during the biennium preceding his or her application for renewal, in a minimum of 30 hours of approved programs of continuing professional pharmacy education as defined in this Code section. Continuing professional pharmacy education shall consist of educational programs providing training pertinent to the practice of pharmacy and approved by the board under this Code section. The board shall approve educational programs for persons practicing pharmacy in this state on a reasonable nondiscriminatory fee basis and may contract with institutions of higher learning, professional organizations, or qualified individuals for the providing of approved programs. In addition to such programs, the board shall allow the continuing professional pharmacy education requirement to be fulfilled by the completion of approved correspondence courses which provide the required hours of approved programs of continuing professional pharmaceutical education or to be fulfilled by a combination of approved correspondence courses and other approved educational programs. The board may, consistent with the requirements of this Code section, promulgate rules and regulations to implement and administer this Code section, including the establishment of a committee to prescribe standards, approve and contract for educational programs, and set the required minimum number of hours per year.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1706, § 19; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-14/HB 132.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “executive director” for “division director” in the second sentence of this Code section.

26-4-46.
Pharmacy interns — Eligibility and requirements for licenses.

To obtain a license as a pharmacy intern, an applicant shall:

Have submitted an application in the form prescribed by the board of pharmacy;

Have attained the age of majority;

Be of good moral character; and

Have paid the fees specified by the board for the issuance of the license.

The following individuals shall be eligible to be licensed as a pharmacy intern:

A student who is currently enrolled in an approved school or college of pharmacy;

An individual who is a graduate of an approved school or college of pharmacy who is currently licensed by the board for the purpose of obtaining practical experience as a requirement for licensure as a pharmacist; or

An individual who does not meet the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection and is a graduate of a pharmacy school or college located in another country but who has completed all requirements of the Foreign Pharmacy Equivalency Certification Program administered by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy. This shall include without being limited to successful completion of all required examinations, the issuance of the equivalency certificate, and an individual evaluation by the board of the applicant’s proficiency in the English language.

The board shall approve all internship programs for the purpose of providing the practical experience necessary for licensure as a pharmacist. A pharmacy intern is authorized to engage in the practice of pharmacy under the supervision of a pharmacist. The board shall adopt rules regarding the licensure of interns and the standards for internship programs.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 277, § 7; Ga. L. 2010, p. 266, § 4/SB 195.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “paragraphs” was substituted for “paragraph” in paragraph (b)(3).

26-4-47.
Pharmacy interns — Validity of licenses.

Licenses issued under Code Section 26-4-46 shall bear the date of issuance and shall be valid for up to five years. Unless said license is renewed by the board, the license shall expire.

Any license issued pursuant to Code Section 26-4-46 shall expire at the time a pharmacy intern is expelled, suspended, dismissed, or withdraws from an approved school or college of pharmacy or is otherwise licensed as a pharmacist pursuant to this title.

Any license issued pursuant to Code Section 26-4-46 shall expire upon notification that a person has taken and failed the board examination for the third time.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-48.
Pharmacy interns — Renewal of licenses; exceptions.

Licenses issued pursuant to Code Section 26-4-46 which shall expire by lapse of time may be renewed upon application, unless, at the time of expiration, there shall be pending action before the board to suspend or revoke such license.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-49.
Drug researcher permits; application for registration; fees; suspension or revocation; penalty for violations.

Every person, firm, corporation, agency, department, or other entity located within this state which handles, possesses, or utilizes controlled substances or dangerous drugs, as defined in Chapter 13 of Title 16, for the purposes of conducting research, analysis, animal training, or drug education, as such purposes may be further defined by the board, and is not otherwise registered as a pharmacist, pharmacy, drug wholesaler, distributor, supplier, or practitioner shall biennially register with the State Board of Pharmacy for a drug researcher permit which shall entitle the holder thereof to purchase, receive, possess, or dispose of such controlled substances and dangerous drugs for such purposes. In applying for the permit:

The application for registration shall be made on a form to be prescribed and furnished by said board and shall show at a minimum the name of the person responsible for filing the application, the name of the applying firm, corporation, agency, department, or other entity, if applicable, the address where the controlled substances or dangerous drugs will be kept secured and can be inspected by the board, together with such other information as may be required by the board;

The person filing the application for the permit shall be the responsible person for the safe and proper storage and accountability, as defined under Chapter 13 of Title 16, for any and all controlled substances and dangerous drugs. Such person shall be responsible for maintaining exact and accurate records regarding the purchase, receipt, utilization, and disposal of all controlled substances and dangerous drugs utilized for purposes granted by this permit. All records must be maintained for a minimum of two years and be readily available for inspection by agents of the board; and

Before approval by the board for any permit issued under this Code section, the application for registration must successfully undergo a thorough investigation by agents of the board to ensure the applicant complies with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations pursuant to handling controlled substances and dangerous drugs as defined under Chapter 13 of Title 16.

The board may require that the application for registration as a drug researcher be accompanied by a fee in an amount established under rules promulgated by the board, and the board may establish conditions for exemptions from such fees. Such registration shall not be transferable and shall expire on the expiration date established by the executive director and may be renewed pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the board. If not renewed, the registration shall lapse and become null and void.

The board shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing the holder of a drug researcher permit as defined under this Code section.

A drug researcher permit may be suspended or revoked or the registrant may be reprimanded, fined, or placed on probation by the board if the registrant fails to comply with all applicable local, state, or federal laws, rules, and regulations.

A holder of a drug researcher permit who is not also licensed as a pharmacist practicing in a duly licensed pharmacy shall not engage in the sale, distribution, or dispensing of controlled substances or dangerous drugs.

Any person, firm, or corporation which violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five years or by a fine not to exceed $10,000.00 or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1706, § 19; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 26; Ga. L. 2013, p. 192, § 1-15/HB 132.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “executive director” for “division director” in the second sentence of subsection (b).

26-4-50.
Drug therapy modification certification.

No pharmacist shall be authorized to modify drug therapy pursuant to Code Section 43-34-24 unless that pharmacist:

Is licensed to practice as a pharmacist in this state;

Has successfully completed a course of study regarding modification of drug therapy and approved by the board;

Annually successfully completes a continuing education program regarding modification of drug therapy and approved by the board; and

Is certified by the board as meeting the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (3) of this subsection.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to expand or change any existing authority for a pharmacist to substitute drugs.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 558, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 6/HB 509.

26-4-51.
Durable medical equipment supplier license; requirements; exemptions; rules and regulations.

Any person who supplies durable medical equipment to a consumer and submits a claim for reimbursement by a third party, either directly or through a contractual arrangement, shall possess a durable medical equipment supplier license issued by the board pursuant to this Code section.

The board shall be authorized to issue a license to an applicant for licensure as a durable medical equipment supplier if the applicant:

Submits an application in the form prescribed by the board;

Maintains an office or place of business within this state;

Pays the license fee established by the board pursuant to paragraph (37) of subsection (a) of Code Section 26-4-28; and

Meets all safety standards and requirements established by the board, including but not limited to the establishment of written procedures for:

Ensuring that all personnel engaged in delivery, maintenance, and repair of durable medical equipment receives annual continuing education;

Instructing the patient or patient’s caregiver on how to use the durable medical equipment provided;

Receiving and responding to complaints from patients;

Maintaining records of all patients receiving durable medical equipment; and

Management, maintenance, and servicing of durable medical equipment.

The board may issue a license to a Medicare enrolled out-of-state manufacturer or wholesale distributor that provides durable medical equipment directly to consumers if such manufacturer or wholesale distributor possesses a valid license from another state. Such manufacturer or wholesale distributor shall be exempt from the requirements of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section.

Licenses issued pursuant to this Code section shall be effective for 36 months from the date of issuance and shall not be transferable or assignable.

The board may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend, revoke, or restrict the licenses of, or fine any person pursuant to the procedures set forth in Code Section 26-4-60 for any of the grounds set forth in subsection (a) of such Code section or upon a finding that the applicant or licensee:

Has violated any state or federal law or regulation related to the provision of durable medical equipment; or

Fails to meet the safety standards established by the board.

The board reserves the right to initially and periodically inspect the applicant’s or licensee’s office or place of business within this state. Such applicant or licensee shall be required to pay a reasonable and adequate fee established by the board pursuant to paragraph (37) of subsection (a) of Code Section 26-4-28 to cover the cost of such inspections.

The following persons and entities shall be exempt from the requirements of this Code section unless any such person or entity has a separate company, corporation, or division that is in the business of supplying durable medical equipment to consumers and submits a claim for reimbursement by a third party:

Pharmacies and pharmacists;

Hospitals;

Ambulatory surgical centers;

Health care facilities owned or operated by the state or federal government;

Skilled nursing facilities;

Assisted living facilities;

Health care practitioners who:

Provide durable medical equipment within the scope of practice of the health care practitioner’s profession; and

Are licensed in this state to practice the health care practitioner’s profession;

Suppliers of insulin infusion pumps and related supplies or services;

Manufacturers or wholesale distributors that do not sell or rent durable medical equipment directly to consumers;

Renal dialysis providers licensed under Code Section 31-44-4 and persons or entities that distribute devices necessary to perform home renal dialysis to patients with chronic kidney disease; and

Suppliers of osteogenesis stimulators, transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulators, pneumatic compression devices, and related supplies or services.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section. Such rules and regulations shall be established with the intent of ensuring patient safety and quality of durable medical equipment. The board may provide by rules and regulations that any person accredited by organizations recognized by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services is deemed to meet all or some of the requirements of this Code section. Further, the board shall be authorized to require the completion of background checks, including, but not limited to, criminal history record checks, on any applicants or licensees, on any persons who will have direct contact with patients, and on any other licensee personnel deemed necessary for purposes of patient safety.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to restrict or prohibit the ability of a person or business to engage in a private transaction between two parties.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 614, § 3/SB 41.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.